Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 1 General Provisions

31-21-1.
Approved disinfectant; “embalming” defined.

An approved disinfectant fluid shall contain not less than 5 percent formaldehyde gas.

As used in this chapter, the term “embalming” means the injection by a licensed embalmer of not less than 10 percent of the weight for bodies of persons dead of communicable diseases, such as smallpox and diphtheria, injected arterially in addition to cavity injection and, in all other cases, not less than 6 percent of the body weight injected arterially in addition to cavity injection.

History.

Ga. L. 1916, p. 77, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-605; Code 1933, § 88-2713, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

Cross references.

Licenses for funeral directors and embalmers, §

43-18-40

et seq.

Law reviews.

For article, “A Review of Three Generations, No Imbeciles: Eugenics, The Court, and Buck v. Bell,” see 26 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1295, (2010).

31-21-2.
Conflict with authority of Commissioner of Agriculture.

Nothing in this article shall repeal or be construed to conflict with any power and authority now vested in the Commissioner of Agriculture by the laws of this state.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-2714, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-21-3.
Death of person with infectious or communicable disease; required reporting procedures; confidentiality; disclosure; penalties.

For the purposes of this Code section, the term “infectious or communicable disease” shall include the following:

Infectious hepatitis;

Tuberculosis;

Any sexually transmitted disease enumerated in Code Section 31-17-1; or

Acquired immune deficiency syndrome (AIDS).

When a person who has been diagnosed as having an infectious or communicable disease dies in a hospital or other health care facility, the attending physician shall prepare a written notification describing such disease to accompany the body when it is picked up for disposition.

When a person dies outside of a hospital or health care facility and without an attending physician, any family member or person making arrangements for the disposition of the dead body who knows that such dead person had been diagnosed as having an infectious or communicable disease at the time of death shall prepare a written notification describing such disease to accompany the body when it is picked up for disposition.

Any person who picks up a dead body for disposition and who has been notified that the person had been diagnosed as having an infectious or communicable disease at the time of death pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection shall present such notification accompanying the dead body to any embalmer, funeral director, or other person taking possession of the dead body.

Information regarding a deceased’s infectious or communicable disease and contained in a notification required to be prepared pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section shall be privileged and confidential and may only be disclosed if:

That disclosure is required pursuant to Chapter 17 of this title;

That disclosure is required by federal law, but only to the extent so required;

That disclosure is made by a physician pursuant to Code Section 24-12-1 or any other law authorizing a physician to disclose otherwise privileged information;

That disclosure is for research purposes and does not reveal:

The identity of the deceased; or

Information which would reveal the identity of the deceased;

That disclosure involves information regarding sexual assault or sexual exploitation of a deceased child and is required to be reported pursuant to Code Section 19-7-5 or any other law requiring the reporting of such assault or exploitation of a child, but only to the extent that such disclosure is so required to be reported;

That disclosure involves information regarding a deceased minor and the disclosure is made to the parent or guardian of that minor; or

That disclosure is made to the person who picks up the dead body or is made in the ordinary course of business to any employee or agent of any person or entity authorized or required under this Code section to receive or report that information.

Information privileged and confidential under this Code section may not be disclosed pursuant to discovery proceedings, subpoena, or court order.

Any disclosure authorized by this Code section or any unauthorized disclosure of information or communications made privileged and confidential by this Code section shall not in any way abridge or destroy the confidential or privileged character thereof except for the purposes for which any authorized disclosure is made. Any person making a disclosure authorized by this chapter shall not be liable therefor, notwithstanding any contrary provisions of law.

Any person having duties imposed upon that person pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section who knowingly refuses or omits to perform such duties shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-21-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1513, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 44/HB 24; Ga. L. 2020, p. 55, § 8/SB 372.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, substituted “sexually transmitted” for “venereal” in paragraph (a)(3).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1991, a semicolon was substituted for the period at the end of paragraph (c)(5).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 101/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that this Act shall apply to any motion made or hearing or trial commenced on or after January 1, 2013.

Law reviews.

For article, “Evidence,” see 27 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2011).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2011).

31-21-4.
Burial at sea of cremated remains; notification that cremated remains are ready for interment; unclaimed cremated remains.

Cremated remains may be taken by boat from any harbor in this state, or by air, for burial at sea at a point not less than three miles from the nearest shoreline. Cremated remains shall be removed from their container before such remains are buried at sea.

Any person who buries at sea, either from a boat or from the air, any human cremated remains shall carry out the burial services within 50 days from the reduction of the body to cremated remains and file with the local registrar of births, deaths, and other vital records in the county nearest the point where the remains were buried a verified statement containing the name of the deceased person, the time and place of death, the place at which the cremated remains were buried, and any other information that the local registrar may require. Burial services may be delayed until weather conditions improve if inclement weather prevents safe burial.

Any person who requests that a dead body be cremated shall provide the funeral establishment or other person responsible for the cremation an address at which such person can be notified when the cremated remains are ready for interment. Notification shall be made by first-class mail to such person at the address provided. If the cremated remains are not claimed for interment or other disposition within 60 days from the date that the notification is mailed, such remains shall be turned over to the coroner to be interred in a plot or niche in a cemetery where indigents are buried.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-21-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 813, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 31.

31-21-5.
Incineration or cremation of dead body or parts thereof.

It shall be unlawful for any person to incinerate or cremate a dead body or parts thereof; provided, however, that the provisions of this subsection shall not apply to a crematory licensed by the State Board of Funeral Service pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 43 or to a hospital, clinic, laboratory, or other facility authorized by the Department of Community Health and in a manner approved by the commissioner of community health.

A person who violates the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-21-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 992, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 2-31/SB 433.

31-21-6.
Notification of law enforcement agency upon disturbance, destruction, or debasement of human remains.

Any person who knows or has reason to believe that interred human remains have been or are being disturbed, destroyed, defaced, mutilated, removed, or exposed without a permit issued pursuant to Code Section 36-72-4, 12-3-52, or 12-3-82 or without written permission of the landowner for an archeological excavation on the site by an archeologist or not in compliance with Section 106 of the National Historic Preservation Act, as amended, and any person who accidentally or inadvertently discovers or exposes human remains shall immediately notify the local law enforcement agency with jurisdiction in the area where the human remains are located.

Any law enforcement agency notified of the discovery or disturbance, destruction, defacing, mutilation, removal, or exposure of interred human remains shall immediately report such notification to the coroner or medical examiner of the county where the human remains are located, who shall determine whether investigation of the death is required under Code Section 45-16-24. If investigation of the death is not required, the coroner or medical examiner shall immediately notify the local governing authority of the county or municipality in which the remains are found and the Department of Natural Resources. If the remains are believed to be those of one or more aboriginal or prehistoric ancestors of or American Indians, then the Department of Natural Resources shall notify the Council on American Indian Concerns. All land-disturbing activity likely to further disturb the human remains shall cease until:

The county coroner or medical examiner, after determining that investigation of the death is required, has completed forensic examination of the site;

A permit is issued for land use change and disturbance pursuant to Code Section 36-72-4; a permit is issued or a contract is let pursuant to subsection (d) of Code Section 12-3-52; or written permission is obtained from the landowner for the conduct of an archeological excavation; or

If such a permit is not sought, the Department of Natural Resources arranges with the landowner for the protection of the remains.

The provisions of this Code section shall not apply to normal farming activity including, but not limited to, plowing, disking, harvesting, and grazing of livestock.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-21-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1790, § 3.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, this Code section was redesignated as Code Section 31-21-6 since Ga. L. 1992, p. 992, § 1, and Ga. L. 1992, p. 1790, § 3, both enacted a Code Section 31-21-5, and “archeologist” was substituted for “archaeologist” in subsection (a).

U.S. Code.

The National Historic Preservation Act, referred to in this Code section, is codified at

16 U.S.C. § 470

et seq.

31-21-7.
Preneed contracts and revisions; affidavit on disposition of remains; role of probate court; warrant as to truthfulness; liability of funeral home.

A person who is 18 years of age or older and of sound mind, by entering into a preneed contract, as defined in paragraph (30) of Code Section 10-14-3, may direct the location, manner, and conditions of the disposition of the person’s remains and the arrangements for funeral goods and services to be provided upon the person’s death. The disposition directions and funeral prearrangements that are contained in a preneed contract shall not be subject to cancellation or substantial revision unless the cancellation or substantial revision has been ordered by a person the decedent has appointed in the preneed contract as the person authorized to cancel or revise the terms of the preneed contract or unless any resources set aside to fund the preneed contract are insufficient under the terms of the preneed contract to carry out the disposition directions and funeral prearrangements contained therein.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, the right to control the disposition of the remains of a deceased person; the location, manner, and conditions of disposition; and arrangements for funeral goods and services to be provided vests in the following, in the order named, provided that such person is 18 years of age or older and is of sound mind:

The health care agent, as defined in Code Section 31-32-2;

(1.1)

If the deceased person died while serving in any branch of the United States Armed Forces as defined in 10 U.S.C. Section 148, the person, if any, designated by the deceased person as authorized to direct disposition as listed on the deceased person’s United States Department of Defense Record of Emergency Data, DD Form 93, or any similar successor form adopted by the Department of Defense;

A person designated by the decedent as the person with the right to control the disposition in an affidavit executed in accordance with subparagraph (B) of this paragraph.

A person who is 18 years of age or older and of sound mind wishing to authorize another person to control the disposition of his or her remains may execute an affidavit before a notary public in substantially the following form:

Click to view

The surviving spouse of the decedent;

The sole surviving child of the decedent or, if there is more than one child of the decedent, the majority of the surviving children; provided, however, that less than one-half of the surviving children shall be vested with the rights under this Code section if they have used reasonable efforts to notify all other surviving children of their instructions and are not aware of any opposition to those instructions on the part of more than one-half of all surviving children;

The surviving parent or parents of the decedent. If one of the surviving parents is absent, the remaining parent shall be vested with the rights and duties under this Code section after reasonable efforts have been unsuccessful in locating the absent surviving parent;

The surviving brother or sister of the decedent or, if there is more than one sibling of the decedent, the majority of the surviving siblings; provided, however, that less than the majority of surviving siblings shall be vested with the rights and duties under this Code section if they have used reasonable efforts to notify all other surviving siblings of their instructions and are not aware of any opposition to those instructions on the part of more than one-half of all surviving siblings;

The surviving grandparent of the decedent or, if there is more than one surviving grandparent, the majority of the grandparents; provided, however, that less than the majority of the surviving grandparents shall be vested with the rights and duties under this Code section if they have used reasonable efforts to notify all other surviving grandparents of their instructions and are not aware of any opposition to those instructions on the part of more than one-half of all surviving grandparents;

The guardian of the person of the decedent at the time of the decedent’s death if one had been appointed;

The personal representative of the estate of the decedent;

The person in the classes of the next degree of kinship, in descending order, under the laws of descent and distribution to inherit the estate of the decedent. If there is more than one person of the same degree, any person of that degree may exercise the right of disposition;

If the disposition of the remains of the decedent is the responsibility of the state or a political subdivision of the state, the public officer, administrator, or employee responsible for arranging the final disposition of decedent’s remains; or

In the absence of any person under paragraphs (1) through (11) of this subsection, any other person willing to assume the responsibilities to act and arrange the final disposition of the decedent’s remains, including the funeral director with custody of the body, after attesting in writing that a good faith effort has been made to no avail to contact the individuals under paragraphs (1) through (11) of this subsection.

A person entitled under law to the right of disposition shall forfeit that right, and the right is passed on to the next qualifying person as listed in subsection (b) of this Code section, in the following circumstances:

Any person charged with murder or voluntary manslaughter in connection with the decedent’s death and whose charges are known to the funeral director; provided, however, that, if the charges against such person are dismissed or if such person is acquitted of the charges, the right of disposition is returned to the person;

Any person who does not exercise his or her right of disposition within two days of notification of the death of decedent or within three days of decedent’s death, whichever is earlier;

If the person and the decedent are spouses and a petition to dissolve the marriage was pending at the time of decedent’s death; or

Where the probate court pursuant to subsection (d) of this Code section determines that the person entitled to the right of disposition and the decedent were estranged at the time of death. For purposes of this Code section, the term “estranged” means a physical and emotional separation from the decedent at the time of death which has existed for a period of time that clearly demonstrates an absence of due affection, trust, and regard for the decedent.

Notwithstanding subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section, the probate court for the county where the decedent resided may award the right of disposition to the person determined by the court to be the most fit and appropriate to carry out the right of disposition and may make decisions regarding the decedent’s remains if those sharing the right of disposition cannot agree. The following provisions shall apply to the court’s determination under this subsection:

If the persons holding the right of disposition are two or more persons with the same relationship to the decedent and they cannot, by majority vote, make a decision regarding the disposition of the decedent’s remains, any of such persons or a funeral home with custody of the remains may file a petition asking the probate court to make a determination in the matter;

In making a determination under this subsection, the probate court shall consider the following:

The reasonableness and practicality of the proposed funeral arrangements and disposition;

The degree of the personal relationship between the decedent and each of the persons claiming the right of disposition;

The desires of the person or persons who are ready, able, and willing to pay the cost of the funeral arrangements and disposition;

The convenience and needs of other families and friends wishing to pay respects;

The desires of the decedent; and

The degree to which the funeral arrangements would allow maximum participation by all wishing to pay respect;

In the event of a dispute regarding the right of disposition, a funeral home shall not be liable for refusing to accept the remains or to inter or otherwise dispose of the remains of the decedent or complete the arrangements for the final disposition of the remains until the funeral home receives a court order or other written agreement signed by the parties in the disagreement that decides the final disposition of the remains. If the funeral home retains the remains for final disposition while the parties are in disagreement, the funeral home may embalm or refrigerate and shelter the body, or both, in order to preserve it while awaiting the final decision of the probate court and may add the cost of embalming or refrigeration and sheltering to the final disposition costs. If a funeral home brings an action under this subsection, the funeral home may add the legal fees and court costs associated with a petition under this subsection to the cost of final disposition. This subsection may not be construed to require or to impose a duty upon a funeral home to bring an action under this subsection. A funeral home and its employees shall not be held criminally or civilly liable for choosing not to bring an action under this subsection; and

Except to the degree it may be considered by the probate court under subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of this subsection, the fact that a person has paid or agreed to pay for all or part of the funeral arrangements and final disposition shall not give that person a greater claim to the right of disposition than the person would otherwise have. The personal representative of the estate of the decedent shall not, by virtue of being the personal representative, have a greater claim to the right of disposition than the person would otherwise have.

Any person signing a funeral service agreement, cremation authorization form, or any other authorization for disposition shall be deemed to warrant the truthfulness of any facts set forth therein, including the identity of the decedent whose remains are to be buried, cremated, or otherwise disposed of, and the party’s authority to order such disposition. A funeral home shall have the right to rely on such funeral service agreement or authorization and shall have the authority to carry out the instructions of the person or persons the funeral home reasonably believes hold the right of disposition. The funeral home shall have no responsibility to contact or to independently investigate the existence of any next of kin or relative of the decedent. If there is more than one person in a class who are equal in priority and the funeral home has no knowledge of any objection by other members of such class, the funeral home shall be entitled to rely on and act according to the instructions of the first such person in the class to make funeral and disposition arrangements, provided that no other person in such class provides written notice of his or her objections to the funeral home.

If a funeral establishment or funeral director relies in good faith upon the instructions of an individual claiming the right of disposition pursuant to subsection (b) or (d) of this Code section and such individual is later determined to have falsely or fraudulently represented himself or herself as having such a right, the funeral establishment or funeral director shall not be subject to criminal or civil liability or subject to disciplinary action for carrying out the disposition of the remains in accordance with such instructions.

“State of Georgia County of I, , do hereby designate with the right to control the disposition of my remains upon my death. I have have not attached specific directions concerning the disposition of my remains with which the designee shall substantially comply, provided that such directions are lawful and there are sufficient resources in my estate to carry out the directions. Subscribed and sworn to before me this day of the month of of the year . (signature of affiant) (signature of notary public)”;

History.

Code 1981, §

31-21-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 292, § 1/HB 68; Ga. L. 2010, p. 208, § 1/SB 355; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 31/HB 942.